it: Tipo di montaggio della base della lampada: Kit di bulloni di ancoraggio; Interramento diretto; Montaggio a flangia; Incasso a superficie; Altro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на основата на лампа: Комплект анкерни болтове; Директно заравяне; Фланцов монтаж; Повърхностно закрепване с болтове; Друго
hu: Lámpaoszlop talpszerelési típusa: Horgonycsavarkészlet; Közvetlenül földbe ásható; Peremes rögzítés; Felszíni rögzítés csavarokkal; Egyéb
en: Lamp post base mounting type: Anchor bolt kit; Direct bury; Flange mount; Surface bolt-down; Other
nl: Montagetype voor lantaarnpaalvoet: Set ankerbouten; Rechtstreeks ingraven; Flensmontage; Oppervlaktemontage; Overig
el: Τύπος στερέωσης βάσης ιστού φωτιστικού: Κιτ αγκύρωσης; Άμεσης ταφής στο έδαφος; Βάση φλάντζας; Επιφανειακή βίδα; Άλλο
fi: Lampun kannan kiinnitystyyppi: Ankkuripulttipakkaus; Maahankaivettava; Laippakiinnitys; Pintakiinnitys pulteilla; Muu
zh-CN: 灯柱底座的安装类型: 锚栓套件; 直埋; 法兰安装; 表面螺栓固定; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem da base do poste de iluminação: Kit de parafuso de ancoragem; Enterramento direto; Montagem com flange; Fixação por parafusos à superfície; Outro
vi: Loại đế gắn cột đèn: Bộ bu lông neo; Chôn trực tiếp; Gắn bằng mặt bích; Bắt vít cố định xuống bề mặt; Khác
zh-TW: 燈柱底座安裝類型: 地腳螺栓工具包; 直埋; 法蘭安裝; 表面螺栓固定; 其他
cs: Způsob montáže stojanu na lampu: Sada upevňovacích šroubů; Přímé uložení do země; Přírubová montáž; Povrchové ukotvení; Jiné
ko: 가로등 기둥 베이스 설치 방식: 앵커 볼트 키트; 직접 매설; 플랜지 마운트; 표면 볼트 고정; 기타
tr: Lamba direği tabanı montaj tipi: Ankraj cıvata kiti; Toprağa gömme; Flanşlı montaj; Yüzeye cıvatalı montaj; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem da base do poste de iluminação: kit de parafuso de ancoragem; Enterro direto; Montagem para flange; Fixação aparafusada à superfície; Outro
ru: Тип крепления основания фонарного столба: Набор анкерных болтов; Установка в грунт; Фланцевое крепление; Крепление болтами к поверхности; Другое
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งฐานเสาไฟ: ชุดสลักเกลียวยึดฐานเสาไฟ; แบบฝังดินโดยตรง; แบบติดตั้งด้วยหน้าแปลน; แบบยึดน็อตบนพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
sv: Monteringstyp för lyktstolpens bas: Förankringsbult-kit; Direkt nedgrävning; Flänsfäste; Ytlig bultning; Övrigt
da: Monteringstype for lygtepælsfod: Ankerboltsæt; Direkte nedgravning; Flangemontering; Overfladeboltning; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže postolja za lampe: Komplet sidrenih vijaka; Izravno zakopavanje; Montaža s prirubnicom; Vijčano pričvršćivanje na podlogu; Ostalo
de: Montagetyp des Laternensockels: Ankerbolzen-Set; Direktverankerung; Flanschmontage; Oberflächenverschraubung; Sonstiges
fr: Système de fixation de la base du lampadaire: Kit de boulons d’ancrage; À enterrer directement; Fixation à bride; Fixation par boulonnage en surface; Autre
ro-RO: Tip de montare a bazei lămpii: Kit buloane de ancorare; Îngropare directă; Montare cu flanșă; Fixare la suprafață cu șuruburi; Altele
lt-LT: Lempos stulpo pagrindo tvirtinimo tipas: Inkarinių varžtų rinkinys; Tiesioginis; Flanšo tvirtinimas; Paviršinis varžtais tvirtinamas; Kita
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia na podstavec stĺpa osvetlenia: Súprava upevňovacích skrutiek; Priame zapustenie; Prírubové uchytenie; Povrchové upevnenie skrutkami; Iné
pl: Typ mocowania podstawy lampy: Zestaw kotew montażowych; Do wkopania w ziemię; Mocowanie kołnierzowe; Mocowanie przykręcane do podłoża; Pozostałe
es: Tipo de montaje en base de poste de luz: Kit de pernos de anclaje; Enterramiento directo; Montaje con bridas; Atornillado de superficie; Otros
sl-SI: Vrsta pritrditve podnožja svetilke: Komplet sidrnih vijakov; Neposredno zakopavanje; Prirobnični nosilec; Pritrditev na površino z vijaki; Druga
nb: Monteringstype for lyktestolpe: Ankerboltsett; Direkte nedgraving; Flensfeste; Overflatebolting; Annet
ja: ランプポストベースの取り付けタイプ: アンカーボルトキット; 直接埋設; フランジマウント; 表面ボルトダウン; その他